Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.92.100

Trial schedule—Statute of limitations—Secrecy of vote—Plaintiff bond.

(1) In an action filed pursuant to this chapter, the trial court shall set a trial to be held no later than one year after the filing of a complaint, and shall set a discovery and motions calendar accordingly.

(2) For purposes of any applicable statute of limitations, a cause of action under this chapter arises every time there is an election for any members of the governing body of the political subdivision.

(3) The plaintiff's constitutional right to the secrecy of the plaintiff's vote is preserved and is not waived by the filing of an action pursuant to this chapter, and the filing is not subject to discovery or disclosure.

(4) In seeking a temporary restraining order or a preliminary injunction, a plaintiff shall not be required to post a bond or any other security in order to secure such equitable relief.

(5) No notice may be submitted to any political subdivision pursuant to this chapter before July 19, 2018.

[ 2019 c 64 s 13; 2018 c 113 s 402.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2019 c 64: See note following RCW 1.20.110.